Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,109
Nebraska Center for the Education of Children who are Blind or Visually Impaired; State Department of Education; powers.

The State Department of Education shall have oversight and general control of the Nebraska Center for the Education of Children who are Blind or Visually Impaired, formerly the Nebraska School for the Visually Handicapped. The department may contract with a school district, an educational service unit, or a public institution of city, county, or state government to operate the center. The department may use, lease, or otherwise contract for the use of property and facilities formerly controlled by the Nebraska School for the Visually Handicapped for services of the center.

Laws 1959, c. 419, § 1, p. 1409;

Laws 1961, c. 412, § 3, p. 1238;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2001;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 891;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 53;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 44;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 53.